Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 93.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8218
General level trauma center, defined.

General level trauma center means a trauma center that (1) provides initial evaluation and stabilization, including surgical stabilization if appropriate, and general medical and surgical inpatient services to patients who can be maintained in a stable or improving condition without specialized care, (2) prepares for transfer and transfers patients meeting predetermined criteria pursuant to the rules and regulations adopted under the Statewide Trauma System Act to higher level trauma centers, (3) is physician directed within a formally organized trauma team, (4) provides trauma-trained physicians and nurses to the emergency department within thirty minutes of notification, (5) has personnel available who can initiate surgery, (6) has appropriate diagnostic capabilities and equipment, and (7) maintains appropriate equipment for pediatric trauma patients in the emergency department, intensive care unit, and operating room.

Laws 1997, LB 626, § 18;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 93.